morphophonology/foma/proclit.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @P.NSTEM.ON@ @P.NMLZ_V.ON@

! s=lə order never occurs in beck corpus, but lə=s= does
! many times.
! same facts for positioning of dəxʷ= (dəxʷ=lə= attested, 
! lə=dəxʷ not)
!
! to cut down on ambiguity, i don't want to posit s= on nouns 
! (i don't think)

!
! since this whole lexicon applies cyclically, no need for internal
! structure

LEXICON Root
lə=       #;
@P.NMLZ_V.ON@dəxʷ= #;
@P.NMLZ_V.ON@s=    #;
ƛ̕u=       #;
tu=       #;
gʷə=      #;
d=        #;! possesive 1po
ɬu=       #;
bə=       #;! "add="
